Maryland, session 2026, SB0215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–1501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Military protection order” [means a protection order issued in accordance
with 10 U.S.C. § 1567 by a commanding officer against a person under the officer’s
command in:
(1) Any branch of the uniformed services of the United States;
(2) The Maryland National Guard; or
(3) The national guard of any other state] HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Education
7–206.1.
(a) An individual honorably discharged from military service may apply to obtain
a high school diploma if the individual withdrew from a regular full–time public or private
high school accredited by the State Board to enlist in the armed forces [of the United States]
during:
– 3 –

Ch. 494 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) World War II;
(2) The Korean Conflict; or
(3) The Vietnam Conflict.
Article – Family Law
4–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(m) “Military protection order” [means a protection order issued in accordance
with 10 U.S.C. § 1567 by a commanding officer against a person under such officer’s
command in:
(1) any branch of the uniformed services of the United States;
(2) the Maryland National Guard; or
(3) the national guard of any other state] HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Local Government
1–204.
(c) The following applicants are ineligible for a credit under this subsection:
(1) a current employee of a county or municipality; and
(2) an eligible veteran who is convicted of a crime after being discharged
from or completing [military] service IN THE UNIFORMED SERVICES.
Article – Natural Resources
4–614.
(a) (1) The Department shall adopt regulations to establish fishing areas
where a trout stamp is required.
(3) A trout stamp is not required of the following:
(iii) Any resident serving in the [armed forces of the United States]
UNIFORMED SERVICES while on leave in the State, during the resident’s leave period, if,
while angling, the resident possesses a copy of the resident’s official leave order; or
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 494
Article – Real Property
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless
otherwise apparent from context.
(A–1) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
8–212.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Active duty” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State
Government Article.
(3) [“Active service member” means “service member” as defined in §
9–901 of the State Government Article.
(4)] “Change of assignment” includes:
(i) Permanent change of station orders;
(ii) Temporary duty orders for a period exceeding 90 days;
(iii) Orders requiring a person to move into quarters located on a
military installation; and
(iv) A release from active duty, including:
1. Retirement;
2. Separation or discharge under honorable conditions; and
3. Demobilization of an activated member of a reserve
component who was serving on active duty orders for at least 180 consecutive days.
[(5)] (4) “Reserve component” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the
State Government Article.
8–402.
(b) (1) (iii) 1. This subparagraph applies only if the landlord or the
landlord’s spouse:
– 5 –

Ch. 494 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A. Is [on active duty with the United States military] AN
ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER;
B. Has relocated to the State as a direct result of being [on
active duty with the United States military] AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER;
C. Intends to occupy the property that is the subject of a
complaint under this section following the entry of a judgment under this section; and
D. Submits documentation supporting the requirements of
this subparagraph with the complaint.
Article – State Government
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(G–1) “MILITARY PROTECTION ORDER” MEANS A PROTECTION ORDER ISSUED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH 10 U.S.C. § 1567 BY A COMMANDING OFFICER AGAINST A
PERSON UNDER THE OFFICER’S COMMAND IN:
(1) ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES;
(2) THE MARYLAND NATIONAL GUARD; OR
(3) THE NATIONAL GUARD OF ANY OTHER STATE.
9–913.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Maryland Veterans Trust Fund.
(d) The Fund consists of:
(2) contributions to the Fund from:
(iii) the designated fees from special registration plates for recipients
of an individually earned, combat–related armed forces medal OR A
NON–COMBAT–RELATED UNIFORMED SERVICES MEDAL OF THE HIGHEST LEVELS
under § 13–619.1 of the Transportation Article; and
Article – Transportation
8–657.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 494
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Federal facility” includes:
(i) An installation of the [armed forces of the United States]
UNIFORMED SERVICES; and
(ii) Any property owned or leased by an agency of the United States.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 7 –